Wyoming, session 2026, HB0192.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-6-102 by creating new subsections
(h) through (k), 31-6-108 by creating new subsections (q)
through (s) and 31-7-307 by creating new subsections (o)
through (q) are amended to read:
HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496

31-6-102. Test to determine alcoholic or controlled
substance content of blood; suspension of license.

(h) Any person who is arrested on suspicion of
driving while under the influence pursuant to W.S. 31-5-233
and who refuses to submit to a chemical test at the request
of a peace officer after the issuance of a search warrant
obtained under subsection (d) of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable by:

(i) Imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both; and

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, a mandatory
suspension of the person's driver's license for a period of
not less than thirty (30) days and not more than one (1)
year.

(j) Refusal to submit to a chemical test under
subsection (h) of this section may be used as evidence
HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496
against a person charged with driving while under the
influence under W.S. 31-5-233.

(k) A person charged with refusal to submit to a
chemical test under subsection (h) of this section shall
submit to a substance use disorder assessment conducted by
a substance use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) or by a
provider certified in that person's state of residence at
or before sentencing and shall complete any recommended
substance use disorder treatment. The cost of the substance
use disorder assessment shall be assessed to and paid by
the offender.

31-6-108. Implied consent requirements for youthful
drivers.

(q) Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age who
is arrested for an offense as defined by W.S. 31-5-234 and
who refuses to submit to a chemical test at the request of
a peace officer after the issuance of a search warrant
obtained under subsection (d) of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable by:
HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496

(i) Imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both; and

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, a mandatory
suspension of the person's driver's license for a period of
not less than thirty (30) days and not more than one (1)
year.

(r) Refusal to submit to a chemical test under
subsection (q) of this section may be used as evidence
against a person charged with driving while under the
influence under W.S. 31-5-233.

(s) A person charged with refusal to submit to a
chemical test under subsection (q) of this section shall
submit to a substance use disorder assessment conducted by
a substance use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) or by a
provider certified in that person's state of residence at
or before sentencing and shall complete any recommended
substance use disorder treatment. The cost of the substance
HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496
use disorder assessment shall be assessed to and paid by
the offender.

31-7-307. Implied consent requirements for commercial
motor vehicle drivers.

(o) Any person who drives or is in actual physical
control of a commercial motor vehicle, who is arrested on
suspicion of driving while under the influence pursuant to
W.S. 31-5-233 and who refuses to submit to a chemical test
at the request of a peace officer after the issuance of a
search warrant obtained under subsection (e) of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by:

(i) Imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both; and

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, a mandatory
suspension of the person's commercial driver's license for
a period of not less than thirty (30) days and not more
than one (1) year.

HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496
(p) Refusal to submit to a chemical test under
subsection (o) of this section may be used as evidence
against a person charged with driving while under the
influence under W.S. 31-5-233.

(q) A person charged with refusal to submit to a
chemical test under subsection (o) of this section shall
submit to a substance use disorder assessment conducted by
a substance use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) or by a
provider certified in that person's state of residence at
or before sentencing and shall complete any recommended
substance use disorder treatment. The cost of the substance
use disorder assessment shall be assessed to and paid by
the offender.

Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0192

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0496
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0192